Texas statutes.
LOCAL GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 8. ACQUISITION, SALE, OR LEASE OF PROPERTY

SUBTITLE A. MUNICIPAL ACQUISITION, SALE, OR LEASE OF PROPERTY

CHAPTER 251. MUNICIPAL RIGHT OF EMINENT DOMAIN

Sec. 251.001. RIGHT OF EMINENT DOMAIN. (a) When the governing body of a municipality considers it necessary, the municipality may exercise the right of eminent domain for a public use to acquire public or private property, whether located inside or outside the municipality, for any of the following uses:

(1) the providing, enlarging, or improving of a municipally owned city hall; police station; jail or other law enforcement detention facility; fire station; library; school or other educational facility; academy; auditorium; hospital; sanatorium; market house; slaughterhouse; warehouse; elevator; railroad terminal; airport; ferry; ferry landing; pier; wharf; dock or other shipping facility; loading or unloading facility; alley, street, or other roadway; park, playground, or other recreational facility; square; water works system, including reservoirs, other water supply sources, watersheds, and water storage, drainage, treatment, distribution, transmission, and emptying facilities; sewage system including sewage collection, drainage, treatment, disposal, and emptying facilities; electric or gas power system; cemetery; and crematory;

(2) the determining of riparian rights relative to the municipal water works;

(3) the straightening or improving of the channel of any stream, branch, or drain;

(4) the straightening, widening, or extending of any alley, street, or other roadway; and

(5) any other municipal public use the governing body considers advisable.

(b) A municipality condemning land under this section may take a fee simple title to the property if the governing body expresses the intention to do so.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 81 (S.B. 18), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 251.002. PROCEDURE. An exercise of the power of eminent domain granted by this chapter is governed by Chapter 21 of the Property Code.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.